Washington statutes.
RCW 4.80.140

Application of chapter.

This chapter shall apply to and govern all civil actions and proceedings, both legal and equitable, and all criminal causes, in the superior courts, but shall not apply to district courts or other courts of limited jurisdiction from which an appeal does not lie directly to the supreme court or court of appeals.

[ 1987 c 202 s 120; 1971 c 81 s 21; 1893 c 60 s 17; RRS s 397, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.